Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5640.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 18. (1) The department shall publish annually a report containing statistical data on revenue collections made by the department during the past fiscal year and may publish additional reports on a periodic basis. (2) Beginning January 1, 1999, revenue Revenue forecasting reports made by the department under this act or made by the department as otherwise provided by law may include dynamic revenue forecasting. As used in this subsection, "dynamic revenue forecasting" means forecasting the direct impact of a tax law change on revenues and the other effects of tax law changes on the behavior of taxpayers and on overall economic activity. (3) Beginning January 1, 2026, the department shall do both of the following: (a) Publish a monthly report on tariffs imposed in this state and the impact of those tariffs on the economy of this state including, but not limited to, the net fiscal impact of tariffs on revenue collections made by the department during the previous month. As used in this subdivision, "tariffs" means any tariff levied by the United States government on another nation on or after January 20, 2025 or a tariff levied by a foreign government on the United States on or after January 20, 2025. (b) Submit a copy of the report required under this subsection to the attorney general.